Washington statutes.
RCW 2.16.040

Uniform court rules.

At its annual meetings, pursuant to section 24, Article IV of the state Constitution, the association shall have power to establish uniform rules for the government of the superior courts, which rules may be amended from time to time.

[ 1955 c 38 s 9; 1933 ex.s. c 58 s 4; RRS s 11051-4.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 83.

Rule-making power, supreme court: RCW 2.04.180 through 2.04.210.

Superior court rules: State Constitution Art. 4 s 24.

Uniform rules to be established: RCW 2.08.230.